cli/src/main/resources/wordguess_hunspell_pl.dic
admiralski/XYbxyc
afotyczny/XYbx
ahmadabadzki/XYbxyc
aktinidiowate/a
albańskojęzyczny/XYbx
albioński/XYbxyc
ambasadzki/XYbxyc
ambystomowate/a
aminoglikozydowy/XYbx
angarski/XYbxyc
antagonizujący/Xbx
antiguański/XYbxyc
antyfaszystowski/XYbxyc
antykrólewski/XYbxyc
antylski/XYbxyc
antyseksistowski/XYbxyc
antywynalazczy/Xbx
aragoński/XYbxyc
araliowate/a
arekowy/XYbx
arkadyjski/XYbxyc
asfodelowate/a
astański/XYbxyc
atraumatyczny/XYbx
auklandzki/XYbxyc
babiakowski/XYbxyc
babkowate/a
badający/Xbxy
bajkalski/XYbxyc
bałkański/XYbxyc
bambusowate/a
baraniogórski/XYbxyc
bartne/a
barwinkowy/XYbx
barzowicki/XYbxyc
becikowe/a
beenowski/XYbxyc
belkowe/a
bereskokartuski/XYbxyc
bezbarwny/XYbxy
bezlistne/a
bezościsty/XYbx
bezwyrazowy/XYbxy
bezżądłowe/a
białaczowski/XYbxyc
biegunecznikowate/a
biełgorodzki/XYbxyc
bignoniowy/XYbx
bitelsowski/XYbxyc
blaszkoskrzelne/a
blatowy/XYbx
bobowate/a
bobrzański/XYbxyc
bogatkowate/a
bolesławski/XYbxyc
bonifikacyjny/XYbx
borneański/XYbxyc
bradfordzki/XYbxyc
bresciański/XYbxyc
brodzące/a
bródnowski/XYbxyc
brunszwicki/XYbxyc
brzuszkowe/a
buczecki/XYbxyc
buntarski/XYbxyc
buńczuczny/XYbxyz
burzykowate/a
byroński/XYbxyc
cekinowy/XYbx
celestynowski/XYbxyc
centralne/a
chalcedoński/XYbxyc
chemoodporny/XYbx
chersoński/XYbxyc
chojeński/XYbxyc
chromogenny/XYbx
chronkowate/a
chwacki/XYbxyc
ciemieńcowate/a
ciemnooliwkowy/XYbxy
cisański/XYbxyc
cudowronkowate/a
cudowronkowaty/XYbx
cyklistowski/XYbxyc
czarnoborski/XYbxyc
czarnogórski/XYbxyc
czarnuchowate/a
czeremchowski/XYbxyc
czeski/XYbxyzc
człekokształtne/a
członiasty/XYbx
czterostrunowy/XYbx
czyhakowate/a
daremniej/b
darłowski/XYbxyc
delfinowate/a
demonologiczny/XYbxy
deweloperski/XYbxyc
diadyczny/XYbx
długoszowate/a
dobrodzieński/XYbxyc
dodomski/XYbxyc
dopuszczalny/XYbxy
drabikowate/a
drański/XYbxyc
drobnomieszczański/XYbxyc
dropiowate/a
drzewnicowate/a
düsseldorfski/XYbxyc
dwuarkuszowy/XYbx
dwunastozgłoskowy/XYbx
dwurożne/a
dydniański/XYbxyc
dyszlowe/a
dzierzgoński/XYbxyc
dzięciołowate/a
dzwonkowate/a
dźwiński/XYbxyc
edytorski/XYbxyc
elastynowy/XYbx
elzewirski/XYbxyc
entuzjastyczniej/b
eupatoryjski/XYbxyc
eurowizyjny/XYbx
fałdopłetwe/a
fejsbukowy/XYbxy
ferraryjski/XYbxyc
flaszowcowaty/XYbx
flądrokształtne/a
fotoreprodukcyjny/XYbx
frankijski/XYbxyc
gadokształtne/a
galanteryjny/XYbxy
galloromański/XYbxyc
gapowe/a
gąsienicznikowate/a
genomodyfikowany/XYbx
germanofilski/XYbxyc
gibonowate/a
gładkolicy/Xbx
głuptakowate/a
gniotowe/a
gnojnicki/XYbxyc
Goplanie/a
gorączkowy/XYbxy
goszczanowski/XYbxyc
góralkowate/a
grębkowski/XYbxyc
grodkowski/XYbxyc
grujecznikowate/a
grzybieniowate/a
gustowniejszy/XYbx
guzikarski/XYbxyc
gzowate/a
harlemski/XYbxyc
hebefreniczny/XYbxy
hiperkapniczny/XYbx
hipopotamowate/a
hispanoamerykański/XYbxyc
hrabski/XYbxyc
hurycki/XYbxyc
igliczniowate/a
ikonograficzny/XYbxy
inguski/XYbxyc
inhumacyjny/XYbx
inwentarski/XYbxyc
istmijski/XYbxyc
jamrajowate/a
jansenistyczny/XYbx
japoński/XYbxyzc
jastrzębiowe/a
jednocalowy/XYbx
jednokopytne/a
jednostopniowy/XYbxy
jelitodyszne/a
jenajski/XYbxyc
jeżowate/a
joniecki/XYbxyc
junnański/XYbxyc
kaczkowate/a
kalmarski/XYbxyc
kaloszowy/XYbx
kanczylowate/a
kapcański/XYbxyc
kapturnikowate/a
karacenowy/XYbx
kartagiński/XYbxyc
kastingowy/XYbx
kaszalotowate/a
kentucki/XYbxyc
kępicki/XYbxyc
kępkowcowate/a
kilkutygodniowy/XYbx
kisielnicowate/a
kitajski/XYbxyc
klotowy/XYbx
kładzione/a
knyszyński/XYbxyc
kokainowate/a
kolczatkowate/a
kolegiacki/XYbxyc
kołbaskowski/XYbxyc
komelinowate/a
komórczakowe/a
kompresorowy/XYbx
konkubencki/XYbxyc
kontrabasowy/XYbx
kopytne/a
koromandelski/XYbxyc
korsarski/XYbxyc
kosaćcowate/a
kostolice/a
kotewkowate/a
kozłowski/XYbxyc
kózkowate/a
kranioskopowy/XYbx
krągłojęzyczne/a
krępieniowate/a
krościeński/XYbxyc
króciuśki/XYbxy
krukowate/a
krzywiczny/XYbx
krzyżowe/a
księżpolski/XYbxyc
kuliste/a
kurdwanowski/XYbxyc
kusakowate/a
kuwaski/XYbxyc
laminacyjny/XYbx
lamnokształtne/a
lateński/XYbxyc
lemurkowate/a
leonciński/XYbxyc
lepiarkowate/a
libański/XYbxyc
lipidowy/XYbx
lipowate/a
liwijski/XYbxyc
lobeliowate/a
lubichowski/XYbxyc
lubszański/XYbxyc
luteranie/a
łapski/XYbxyc
łatwochłonny/XYbx
łączniowate/a
łowikowate/a
łukowicki/XYbxyc
łuszczeńcowate/a
macierzowy/XYbxy
majkowate/a
majski/XYbxyc
malowniczy/Xbxy
malwowate/a
manilski/XYbxyc
markuszowski/XYbxyc
marsyliowate/a
masajski/XYbxyc
mącznikowate/a
meczetowy/XYbx
melomański/XYbxyc
meteorytyczny/XYbx
miecherowate/a
miejskopiastowski/XYbxyc
międzyeuropejski/XYbxyc
mięsożerne/a
mikrograntowy/XYbx
miłogradzki/XYbxyc
minione/a
misecznicowate/a
misterniej/b
młynne/a
modniarski/XYbxyc
mollowy/XYbxy
morsowate/a
moszczenicki/XYbxyc
motylkowate/a
mozartowski/XYbxyc
murenowate/a
myszowaty/XYbx
myśliwski/XYbxyc
nadobne/a
nadświdrzański/XYbxyc
najcelniejszy/XYbx
najdźwięczniej/b
najjednostronniejszy/XYbx
najmorowszy/XYbx
najobojętniejszy/XYbx
najpomyślniejszy/XYbx
najradziej/b
najsprężystszy/XYbx
najułomniej/b
najzapalniejszy/XYbx
nałużynowate/a
namysłowski/XYbxyc
nanometryczny/XYbx
nawałnicowy/XYbx
nawałnikowate/a
neoficki/XYbxyc
neuroplegiczny/XYbx
niemczański/XYbxyc
nieprzeżuwające/a
nierentowniejszy/XYbx
nobliwszy/XYbx
nowiński/XYbxyc
nowopłetwe/a
nowowiśnicki/XYbxyc
numerkowy/XYbx
obrzydliwy/XYbxy
odlewowy/XYbx
odmieńcowate/a
odreżyserski/XYbxyc
ogadeński/XYbxyc
okrągłogłowy/XYbx
olimpijski/XYbxyc
oliwkowate/a
opatowiecki/XYbxyc
ormiański/XYbxyzc
orzeszkowy/XYbx
orzesznikowate/a
ostronogowate/a
otwocki/XYbxyc
outsourcingowy/XYbx
palczakowate/a
pałecznicki/XYbxyc
paprociowate/a
parasympatykotoniczny/XYbx
parowski/XYbxyc
paziowate/a
pekiński/XYbxyc
performerski/XYbxyc
pępkowe/a
picassowski/XYbxyc
pięciowapniowy/XYbx
piękne/a
pirenejski/XYbxyc
piwoniowate/a
płaszczkokształtne/a
płonny/XYbxy
pochutnikowate/a
pocieszycielski/XYbxyc
podręcznikowy/XYbxy
podstarościński/XYbxyc
podzwonne/a
pokutne/a
polotniej/b
połowiecki/XYbxyc
ponurnikowate/a
poręczycielski/XYbxyc
portowy/XYbx
postronkowe/a
pozaczasowy/XYbxy
pozamistrzowski/XYbxyc
półoficjalny/XYbxy
późnogrecki/XYbxyc
pranagozalążkowe/a
prędkonogi/XYbx
princetoński/XYbxyc
proprezydencki/XYbxyc
pryszczyrnicowate/a
prządkowaty/XYbx
przeciszowski/XYbxyc
przedpremierowy/XYbxy
przemszański/XYbxyc
przewspaniały/XYbxy
przędziorkowate/a
pseudobiedermeierowski/XYbxyc
ptasiomiedniczne/a
puławski/XYbxyc
radionawigacyjny/XYbx
radoszycki/XYbxyc
rajowate/a
redłowski/XYbxyc
rentowny/XYbxy
Retoromanie/a
rezydencki/XYbxyc
rosiczkowate/a
rozetlały/XYbx
równoskrzydłe/a
różewiczowski/XYbxyc
różnoczasowy/XYbxy
ryjkowcowate/a
rzeczenicki/XYbxyc
sakowate/a
sakwowy/XYbx
samojedzki/XYbxyc
selamski/XYbxyc
selenowodorowy/XYbx
sewelowate/a
sieneński/XYbxyc
sinoniebieski/XYbxy
skarpiowate/a
skokowski/XYbxyc
skrytopączkowe/a
słonecznikowy/XYbx
słupozębne/a
sobiborski/XYbxyc
sotyjski/XYbxyc
spachaczowate/a
spiczakowy/XYbx
starochorwacki/XYbxyc
starosłoweński/XYbxyc
starożytniejszy/XYbx
Stodoranie/a
stryjski/XYbxyc
strzelczykowate/a
substytutywny/XYbxy
sumatryjski/XYbxyc
syrakuzański/XYbxyc
szakalogłowy/XYbx
szakłakowate/a
szczytnicowate/a
szerpijski/XYbxyc
szkaradny/XYbxy
szponiaste/a
szwagrowski/XYbxyc
ślizgunowate/a
średnioaryjski/XYbxyc
środkowowłoski/XYbxyc
taksówkarski/XYbxyc
tamaryszkowate/a
targańcowy/XYbx
tedzoński/XYbxyc
terpugowate/a
tkaninopodobny/XYbx
tomaszowski/XYbxyc
trenerski/XYbxyc
trędownikowate/a
trojeściowy/XYbx
trzonopłetwe/a
trzymilowy/XYbx
tucholski/XYbxyc
tyfliski/XYbxyc
Tyskie/a
udaroodporny/XYbx
ultrarentgenowski/XYbxyc
ustrojodawczy/Xbx
wadżdyjski/XYbxyc
wallombrozjanie/a
wawrzynowate/a
ważniacki/XYbxyc
wdrożeniowy/XYbx
wewnątrzmiejski/XYbxyc
wężykowate/a
wielkośrodowy/XYbx
wielopłetwcokształtne/a
wierszoklecki/XYbxyc
wilczomleczowate/a
wilgowaty/XYbx
wiszeński/XYbxyc
włóczebne/a
wojkowicki/XYbxyc
worczakowate/a
wólecki/XYbxyc
wróblewski/XYbxyc
wujkowate/a
wydolnościowy/XYbxy
wyrski/XYbxyc
wyszukany/XYbxy
wywilżankowate/a
zagórzański/XYbxyc
zalany/XYbx
zarazowate/a
zawierciański/XYbxyc
zawoźny/XYbx
zdrojkowate/a
zielonkowaty/XYbx
zięciowski/XYbxyc
złotogłowowate/a
zrosłoszczękie/a
zrzędliwszy/XYbx
żarłaczokształtne/a
żelazkowski/XYbxyc
żylakowy/XYbx
